New York, session 2025-2026, S1886.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 66-x to read as follows: 3 § 66-x. Solar facility safety. 1. For the purposes of this section, 4 the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Solar facility" means an electric generating facility, as defined 6 by section five hundred seventy-five-a of the real property tax law, or 7 portion thereof, that collects, converts, or stores solar energy for the 8 generation of electricity with the use of solar thermal and/or photovol- 9 taic technologies. 10 (b) "Safety data sheet" means the document containing information and 11 instructions for safe use and potential hazards associated with partic- 12 ular chemicals and materials that is approved by the federal Occupa- 13 tional Safety and Health Administration. 14 2. Every solar facility in the state shall have the safety data sheet 15 conspicuously posted in any area on such solar facility that would like- 16 ly be accessed by emergency responders in the case of a fire or other 17 emergency. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05498-01-5